Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE B. JUDGES

CHAPTER 32. ADDITIONAL COMPENSATION OF DISTRICT JUDGES

SUBCHAPTER A. ADDITIONAL COMPENSATION PAID BY COUNTY FOR EXTRAJUDICIAL SERVICES

Sec. 32.001. AUTHORITY FOR ADDITIONAL COMPENSATION. (a) The commissioners court of a county may pay the judges of the district courts having jurisdiction in the county additional compensation in an amount that does not exceed the limitations of Section 659.012 for extrajudicial services performed by the district judges.

(b) The compensation shall be paid from the county general fund or other available funds of the county in:

(1) monthly installments; or

(2) biweekly installments if authorized by the commissioners court.

(c) The compensation is in addition to the salary paid by the state and any other compensation authorized by law.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., 2nd C.S., Ch. 3 (H.B. 11), Sec. 6, eff. December 1, 2005.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 194 (S.B. 560), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2013.

SUBCHAPTER B. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 32.302. SALARY OF SPECIAL JUDGES. (a) The salary of a special judge commissioned by the governor under Article V, Section 11, of the Texas Constitution or elected by practicing lawyers or agreed on by parties as provided by law is determined and paid in accordance with this section.

(b) The special judge is entitled to the same salary as a district judge for every day the special judge performs the duties of judge. In addition, a special judge commissioned by the governor is entitled to the same pay as a district judge for each day the special judge is necessarily occupied going to and returning from the place the judge is required to hold court.

(c) The amount of the special judge's daily salary is determined by dividing the salary of a district judge by 365.

(d) A special judge commissioned by the governor must present a sworn account to the comptroller of public accounts. The account must show the number of days necessarily occupied in going to and coming from the place the special judge was required to hold court and must be accompanied by evidence that the special judge was properly commissioned. The account must be certified to be correct by the judge or clerk of the judicial district in which the special judge performed services.

(e) A special judge elected by practicing lawyers or agreed to by parties must present to the comptroller of public accounts a certificate of the clerk of the judicial district in which the special judge performed services showing the record of the election or appointment and the services rendered. The certificate must be accompanied by the sworn account of the special judge showing the number of days actually served as judge.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 32.303. AUTOMOBILE ALLOWANCE. A commissioners court may pay the judges of the district courts in the county an automobile allowance in an amount set by the commissioners court for automobile expenses incurred in performing official duties.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 431, Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 1989; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 605, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 8.02, eff. Aug. 26, 1991.